de: Paillettenform: Gewölbt; Tief gewölbt; Flach; Wendbar / klappbar; Leicht gewölbt; Sonstige
da: Koptype: Skålformet; Dyb skål; Flad; Vendbar/flip; Let skålformet; Andet
zh-TW: 亮片杯型: 罩杯式; 深罩杯; 平口; 雙面 / 翻轉; 微罩杯式; 其他
lt-LT: Kaušelio tipas: Išgaubtas; Gilus kaušelis; Plokščias; Dvipusis / apverčiamas; Šiek tiek išgaubtas; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta šalice: Zaobljeno; Duboko zaobljeno; Ravno; Dvosmjerno/preklopno; Blago zaobljeno; Ostalo
cs: Typ šálku: S košíčky; Hluboký košíček; Plochý; Oboustranný; Lehce vyztužený košíček; Ostatní
pl: Typ miseczki: Miseczkowy; Głęboka miseczka; Płaski; Dwustronny / odwracany; Lekko miseczkowy; Inne
ro-RO: Tipul cupei: Tip cupă; Cupă adâncă; Plat; Reversibil / flip; Ușor tip cupă; Altele
zh-CN: 杯型: 杯状; 深杯; 平坦; 可翻转/翻盖; 微杯状; 其他
nb: Kopptype: Skålformet; Dyp skål; Flat; Vendbar / vippbar; Lett skålformet; Annet
es: Tipo de copa: Con copa; Copa profunda; Plano; Reversible/plegable; Copa ligera; Otro
fr: Type de coupe: Incurvé; Coupe profonde; Plat; Réversible / rabattable; Légèrement incurvé; Autre
bg-BG: Тип чашка: С чашки; Дълбока чашка; Плосък; Двулицев / обръщащ се; С леко оформени чашки; Други
vi: Loại chén đính kim sa: Khum; Cúp sâu; Phẳng; Hai mặt / có thể lật; Hơi khum; Khác
sv: Kopptyp: Kupad; Djup kupa; Platt; Vändbar/flip; Lätt kupad; Övrigt
tr: Çukur tipi: Oyuk; Derin kap; Düz; Çift taraflı / çevrilebilir; Hafif oyuk; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ flitra: S košíčkami; Hlboké košíčky; Ploché; Obojstranné / preklápacie; S miernymi košíčkami; Iné
ja: カップタイプ: カップ状; ディープカップ; フラット; リバーシブル / フリップ; 浅いカップ状; その他
ko: 컵 유형: 컵형; 딥 컵형; 평면형; 양면 / 플립형; 약간 파인 컵형; 기타
nl: Cup type: Gecupt; Diepe cup; Plat; Omkeerbaar / flip; Licht gecupt; Overig
sl-SI: Vrsta profila: Vdolbeno; Globoka vdolbina; Ravno; Obojestransko / preklopno; Rahlo vdolbeno; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de chávena: Com copa; Copa funda; Plana; Reversível/flip; Ligeiramente com copa; Outro
th: ประเภทถ้วย: ทรงถ้วย; ทรงถ้วยลึก; แบน; พับ/สลับด้านได้; ทรงถ้วยตื้น; อื่นๆ
fi: Kuppityyppi: Kuppimainen; Syvä kuppi; Litteä; Käännettävä / käännettävissä; Hieman kuppimainen; Muu
hu: Kehely típusa: Kosaras; Mély kosaras; Lapos; Kifordítható/kétoldalas; Enyhén kosaras; Egyéb
en: Cup type: Cupped; Deep cup; Flat; Reversible / flip; Slightly cupped; Other
ru: Тип чашечки: Чашевидный; Глубокая чашка; Плоский; Двусторонний / откидной; Слегка чашевидный; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de concavidade: Côncavo; Bojo profundo; Plano; Reversível / de virar; Levemente côncavo; Outro
it: Tipo di tazza: A coppa; Coppa profonda; Piatta; Reversibile/flip; Lievemente a coppa; Altro
el: Τύπος κοιλότητας: Με κοιλότητα; Βαθιά κοιλότητα; Επίπεδο; Δύο όψεων / Αναστρέψιμο; Με ελαφριά κοιλότητα; Άλλο